Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,128
State Athletic
Commissioner; appointment; term; salary; bond or insurance; assistants.

There is hereby established the position of State Athletic Commissioner.
The commissioner shall be appointed by the Governor and shall hold office
for a term of two years commencing the first Thursday after the first Tuesday
of January in each odd-numbered year. The commissioner shall receive such
salary as the Governor may elect and shall be bonded or insured as required
by section 11-201. The commissioner may be reappointed for successive terms.

The office of the commissioner shall be located within and under the general supervision of the Charitable
Gaming Division of the Department of Revenue. The commissioner may exercise
and perform his or her powers and duties at any location in the state. The
commissioner may employ assistants and fix their compensation in conjunction
with the Charitable Gaming Division. The compensation of assistants and expenses
of the office of the commissioner shall be paid through the State Athletic
Commissioner's Cash Fund.

Laws 1957, c. 382, § 1, p. 1326;

Laws 1978, LB 653, § 33;

Laws 1993, LB 397, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 41;

Laws 2006, LB 941, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB879, § 21;

Laws 2011, LB210, § 11.